Utah statutes.
63K-1-301.   Division to consult with legislative and judicial branch.
The Division of Homeland Security may consult with the Legislative Management
Committee, the Judicial Council, and legislative and judicial staff offices to
assist them in preparing emergency succession plans and procedures.
